Hawaii statutes.
[§132D‑16.6] Display
site inspection. Each county fire chief is authorized to conduct
inspections of the persons conducting a display, including the site where the
display is occurring or will occur within the fire chief's county to determine
compliance with the applicable county code and the current editions of the
National Fire Protection Association's "NFPA 1123: Code for Fireworks
Display" and "NFPA 1126: Standard for the Use of Pyrotechnics Before
a Proximate Audience". An inspection fee of $200 shall be assessed by the
county upon the holder of a permit for a display under section 132D-10(2),
which shall be separate from the display permit fee under that section. The
inspection fee shall be paid to the county in which the display will occur, and
shall be used to defray the cost of the official conducting the inspection of
the display setup. [L 2011, c 127, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next